Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 7
COMPETENCY TO PROCEED

19-2.5-701. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The juvenile justice system is civil in nature and focused on rehabilitation rather than punishment;

Juveniles differ in significant and substantive ways from adults; therefore, different standards for competency are necessary for juveniles and adults; and

Notwithstanding the differences between adults and juveniles, age alone is not determinative of incompetence without a finding that the juvenile actually lacks the relevant capacities for competence.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 610, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1300.2 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-702. Incompetent to proceed - effect - how and when raised.

This part 7 applies only to proceedings brought pursuant to this title 19.

A juvenile must not be tried or sentenced if the juvenile is incompetent to proceed, as defined in section 19-2.5-102, at that stage of the proceedings. Juveniles, like adults, are presumed competent to proceed, as defined in section 19-2.5-102, until
such time as they are found incompetent to proceed through a decision by the court. A determination of competency must include an evaluation of intellectual and developmental disabilities, mental health disorders, and mental capacity.
Age alone is not determinative of incompetence without a finding that the juvenile actually lacks the relevant capacities for competence.

When a party specified in this subsection (3) has reason to believe that a juvenile is incompetent to proceed in a delinquency action, the party shall raise the question of the juvenile's competency in the following manner:

On its own motion, the court shall suspend the proceeding and determine the competency or incompetency of the juvenile pursuant to section 19-2.5-703;

By motion of the prosecution, probation officer, guardian ad litem, or defense, made in advance of the commencement of the particular proceeding. The motion may be filed after the commencement of the proceeding if, for good cause shown, the juvenile's
mental health was unknown or unapparent before the commencement of the proceeding.

By the juvenile's parent or legal guardian.

If the issue of competency is raised at the time charges are filed or at any time thereafter and the juvenile is not represented by counsel, the court may immediately appoint counsel and may also appoint a guardian ad litem to ensure the best interests
of the juvenile are addressed in accordance with existing law.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 610, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1301 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-703. Determination of incompetency to proceed.

Whenever the question of a juvenile's competency to proceed is raised, the court shall make a preliminary finding that the juvenile is or is not competent to proceed. If the court feels that the information available to it is inadequate for making such
a finding, it shall order a competency examination.

The court shall immediately notify the prosecuting attorney and defense counsel of the preliminary finding regarding competency. The prosecuting attorney or the defense counsel may request a hearing on the preliminary finding by filing a written request
with the court within fourteen days after the date on which the court issues the preliminary finding, unless the court extends the time period for good cause. The preliminary finding becomes a final determination if neither the
prosecuting attorney nor defense counsel requests a hearing. Upon the timely written request of either the prosecuting attorney or defense counsel, the court shall hold a competency hearing. If the court did not order a competency
examination or other evaluation prior to its preliminary determination and the court determines adequate mental health information is not available, the court shall refer the juvenile for a competency examination prior to the hearing.
At the conclusion of the competency hearing, the court shall make a final determination regarding the juvenile's competency to proceed. At a competency hearing held pursuant to this subsection (2), the burden of submitting evidence
and the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence are upon the party asserting the juvenile's incompetency.

If the question of a juvenile's incompetency to proceed is raised after a jury is impaneled to try the issues raised by a plea of not guilty or after the court as the finder of fact begins to hear evidence and the court determines that the juvenile is
incompetent to proceed or orders the juvenile referred for a competency examination, the court may declare a mistrial. If the court declares a mistrial under these circumstances, the juvenile must not be deemed to have been placed
in jeopardy with regard to the charges at issue. The juvenile may be tried on, and sentenced if adjudicated for, the same charges after the juvenile has achieved or been restored to competency.

If the court orders a competency evaluation, the court shall order that the competency evaluation be conducted in the least-restrictive environment, including home or community placement, if appropriate, taking into account the public safety and the best
interests of the juvenile.

A competency evaluation must be conducted by a licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist who is experienced in the clinical evaluation of juveniles and trained in forensic competency assessments, or a psychiatrist or psychologist who is in forensic
training and under the supervision of a licensed forensic psychiatrist or licensed psychologist with expertise in forensic psychology.

The competency evaluation must, at a minimum, include an opinion regarding whether the juvenile is incompetent to proceed as defined in section 19-2.5-102. If the evaluation concludes the juvenile is incompetent to proceed, the evaluation must include
a recommendation as to whether there is a likelihood that the juvenile may achieve or be restored to competency and identify appropriate services to restore the juvenile to competency.

The evaluator conducting the competency evaluation shall file the evaluation with the court within:

Thirty-five days after issuance of the order for the competency evaluation, unless good cause is shown for a delay, if the juvenile is held in a secure detention facility;

Forty-nine days after issuance of the order for the competency evaluation, unless good cause is shown for a delay, if the juvenile is not held in a secure detention facility.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 611, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1302 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-704. Procedure after determination of competency or incompetency.

If the court finally determines pursuant to section 19-2.5-703 that the juvenile is competent to proceed, the court shall order that the suspended proceeding continue or, if a mistrial has been declared, shall reset the case for trial at the earliest
possible date.

If the court finally determines pursuant to section 19-2.5-703 that the juvenile is incompetent to proceed but may be restored to competency, the court shall stay the proceedings and order that the juvenile receive services designed to restore the juvenile
to competency, based upon recommendations in the competency evaluation, unless the court makes specific findings that the recommended services in the competency evaluation are not justified. The court shall order that the
restoration services ordered are provided in the least-restrictive environment, taking into account the public safety and the best interests of the juvenile, and that the provision of the services and the juvenile's participation
in those services occur in a timely manner. The court shall review the provision of and the juvenile's participation in the services and the juvenile's progress toward competency at least every ninety-one days until competency
is restored, unless the juvenile is in custody, in which event the court shall review the case every thirty-five days to ensure the prompt provision of services in the least-restrictive environment. The court shall not
maintain jurisdiction longer than the maximum possible sentence for the original offense, unless the court makes specific findings of good cause to retain jurisdiction. However, the juvenile court's jurisdiction shall not
extend beyond the juvenile's twenty-first birthday.

Pursuant to section 27-60-105, the behavioral health administration in the department of human services is the entity responsible for the oversight of restoration education and coordination of services necessary to competency restoration.

If the court finally determines pursuant to section 19-2.5-703 that the juvenile is incompetent to proceed and cannot be restored to competency, the court shall determine whether a management plan for the juvenile is necessary, taking into account the
public safety and the best interests of the juvenile. If the court determines a management plan is necessary, the court shall develop the management plan after ordering that the juvenile be placed in the least-restrictive
environment, taking into account the public safety and best interests of the juvenile. If the court determines a management plan is unnecessary, the court may continue any treatment or plan already in place for the juvenile.
The management plan must, at a minimum, address treatment for the juvenile, identify the party or parties responsible for the juvenile, and specify appropriate behavior management tools, if they are not otherwise part of
the juvenile's treatment.

The management plan may include:

Placement options included in article 10.5 or 65 of title 27;

A treatment plan developed by a licensed mental health professional;

An informed supervision model;

Institution of a guardianship petition; or

Any other remedy deemed appropriate by the court.

If the charges are not dismissed earlier by the district attorney, the charges against a juvenile found to be incompetent and unrestorable must be dismissed no later than the maximum possible sentence for the original offense after the date of the court's
finding of incompetent and unrestorable, unless the court makes specific findings of good cause to retain jurisdiction. However, the juvenile court's jurisdiction shall not extend beyond the juvenile's twenty-first birthday.

A determination pursuant to subsection (2) of this section that a juvenile is incompetent to proceed must not preclude the court from considering the release of the juvenile on bond upon compliance with the standards and procedures for such release prescribed
by statute. At any hearing to determine eligibility for release on bond, the court may consider any effect the juvenile's incompetency may have on the juvenile's ability to ensure the juvenile's presence for trial.

Source:

L. 2021:
(4) amended, (SB 21-071), ch. 463, p. 3336, § 6, effective July 6; entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 612, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(2)(b) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1505, § 48, effective July 1; (3)(b)(I) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2972, § 38, effective August 10.

19-2.5-705. Restoration to competency hearing.

The court may order a restoration to competency hearing, as defined in section 19-2.5-102, at any time on its own motion, on motion of the prosecuting attorney, or on motion of the juvenile. The court shall order a restoration of competency hearing if
a competency evaluator with the qualifications described in section 19-2.5-703 (4)(b) files a report certifying that the juvenile is competent to proceed.

At the hearing, if the question is contested, the burden of submitting evidence and the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence is on the party asserting that the juvenile is competent.

At the restoration to competency hearing, the court shall determine whether the juvenile has achieved or is restored to competency.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 613, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1304 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-706. Procedure after restoration to competency hearing.

If a juvenile is found to have achieved or been restored to competency after a restoration to competency hearing, pursuant to section 19-2.5-705, or by the court during a review, pursuant to section 19-2.5-704 (2), the court shall resume or recommence
the trial or sentencing proceeding or order the sentence carried out. The court may credit any time the juvenile spent in confinement or detention while incompetent to proceed against any term of commitment imposed after achievement
of or restoration to competency.

If the court determines that the juvenile remains incompetent to proceed and the delinquency petition is not dismissed, the court may continue or modify any orders entered at the time of the original determination of incompetency or enter any new order
necessary to facilitate the juvenile's achievement of or restoration to competency.

Evidence obtained during a competency evaluation or during treatment related to the juvenile's competency or incompetency and the determination as to the juvenile's competency or incompetency are not admissible on the issues raised by a plea of not guilty.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 614, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1305 as it existed prior to 2021.